Alaska, session 34, HB381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 01 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 02 to read: 03 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (a) The legislature finds that the tax 04 treatment in sec. 30 of this Act is necessary to advance a major natural gas project and to 05 ensure that 06 (1) the project maximizes the benefit to the state by ensuring direct and 07 affordable access to natural gas to the residents of the state; and 08 (2) communities affected by the natural gas project are protected from the 09 negative effects of the project. 10 (b) The legislature finds that, given that the state is part owner of the natural gas 11 project, the project labor agreement, prevailing wage, and apprenticeship utilization 12 requirements in this Act are necessary to advance the project, avoid unnecessary interruptions, 13 and ensure efficient completion, predictable labor costs, a steady supply of skilled labor, high 14 quality training, coordination among multiple employers, and certainty about terms and 15 conditions of employment. 16 (c) Nothing in this Act is intended to establish, modify, impair, waive, or otherwise 17 affect the tax treatment, assessment methodology, valuation, taxing authority, or applicability 18 of taxes imposed under AS 29.45 or AS 43.56 with respect to any other property, project, 19 facility, infrastructure, or taxpayer. It is the intent of the legislature that this Act be narrowly 20 construed and not serve as precedent, guidance, or interpretive authority for the taxation of 21 any other property subject to taxation under AS 29.45 or AS 43.56. 22 * Sec. 2. AS 14.17.410(b), as amended by sec. 7, ch. 22, SLA 2026, is amended to read: 23 (b) Public school funding consists of state aid, a required local contribution, 24 and eligible federal impact aid determined as follows: 25 (1) state aid equals basic need minus a required local contribution and 26 90 percent of eligible federal impact aid for t hat fiscal year; basic need equals the sum 27 obtained under (D) of this paragraph, multiplied by the base student allocation set out 28 in AS 14.17.470; district adjusted ADM is calculated as follows: 29 (A) the ADM of each school in the district is calculated by 30 applying the school size factor to the student count as set out in AS 14.17.450; 31 (B) the number obtained under (A) of this paragraph is 01 multiplied by the district cost factor described in AS 14.17.460; 02 (C) the ADMs of each school in a district, as adjusted 03 according to (A) and (B) of this paragraph, are added; the sum is then 04 multiplied by the special needs factor set out in AS 14.17.420(a)(1) and the 05 secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor set out in 06 AS 14.17.420(a)(3); 07 (D) the number obtained for intensive services under 08 AS 14.17.420(a)(2) and the number obtained for correspondence study under 09 AS 14.17.430 are added to the number obtained under (C) of this paragraph or 10 under (H) and (I) of this paragraph; 11 (E) notwithstanding (A) - (C) of this paragraph, if a school 12 district's ADM adjusted for school size under (A) of this paragraph decreases 13 by five percent or more from one fiscal year to the next fiscal year, the school 14 district may use the last fiscal year before the decrease as a base fiscal year to 15 offset the decrease, according to the following method: 16 (i) for the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year 17 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 18 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 19 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 75 percent of the 20 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 21 base fiscal year and the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 22 (ii) for the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year 23 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 24 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 25 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 50 percent of the 26 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 27 base fiscal year and the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 28 (iii) for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year 29 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 30 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 31 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 25 percent of the 01 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 02 base fiscal year and the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 03 (F) the method established in (E) of this paragraph is available 04 to a school district for the three fiscal years following the base fiscal year 05 determined under (E) of this paragraph only if the district's ADM adjusted for 06 school size determined under (A) of this paragraph for each fiscal year is less 07 than the district's ADM adjusted for school size in the base fiscal year; 08 (G) the method established in (E) of this paragraph does not 09 apply to a decrease in the district's ADM adjusted for school size resulting 10 from a loss of enrollment that occurs as a result of a boundary change under 11 AS 29; 12 (H) notwithstanding (A) - (C) of this paragraph, if one or more 13 schools close and consolidate with one or more other schools in the same 14 community and district and, as a result of the consolidation, basic need 15 generated by the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under 16 (A) - (C) of this paragraph decreases, the district may use the last fiscal year 17 before the consolidation as the base fiscal year to offset that decrease for the 18 first four fiscal years following consolidation according to the following 19 method: 20 (i) for the first two fiscal years after the base fiscal year, 21 the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - 22 (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 23 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 24 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 25 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 26 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the district's ADM of 27 the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under 28 (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's ADM of the 29 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 30 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 31 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, and 01 adding that number to the sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated 02 schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 03 paragraph; 04 (ii) for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year, the 05 district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) 06 of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 07 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 08 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 09 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 10 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the 11 district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as 12 adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's 13 ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, 14 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 15 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 16 multiplying that number by 66 percent, and adding that number to the 17 sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current 18 fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph; 19 (iii) for the fourth fiscal year after the base fiscal year, 20 the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - 21 (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 22 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 23 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 24 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 25 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the 26 district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as 27 adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's 28 ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, 29 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 30 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 31 multiplying that number by 33 percent, and adding that number to the 01 sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current 02 fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph; 03 (iv) to calculate the district's basic need for each fiscal 04 year, the number obtained through the calculation in (i), (ii), or (iii) of 05 this subparagraph is added to the number obtained under (C) of this 06 paragraph for the remainder of the district; 07 (I) if the basic need calculated under (H)(i) - (iii) of this 08 paragraph for one of the first four fiscal years after consolidation is less than 09 the basic need calculated under (A) - (C) of this paragraph for that fiscal year, 10 the basic need may not be adjusted under (H) of this paragraph for that fiscal 11 year; 12 (J) a district may not offset a decrease under (H) of this 13 paragraph if 14 (i) a new facility is constructed in the district for the 15 consolidation; or 16 (ii) the district offset a decrease under (E) of this 17 paragraph in the same fiscal year; 18 (K) a district that offsets a decrease under (H) of this paragraph 19 may not reopen a school that was closed for consolidation in the district until 20 (i) four or more years have passed since the school 21 closure; and 22 (ii) the district provides evidence satisfactory to the 23 department that the schools affected by the consolidation are over 24 capacity; 25 (L) a district may not reopen and reconsolidate a school that 26 was consolidated in the district more than once every four years for purposes 27 of the calculations made under (H) of this paragraph; 28 (M) a district offsetting a decrease under (H) of this paragraph 29 shall provide the department with the list of schools participating in the 30 consolidation and the corresponding ADM; 31 (2) the required local contribution of a city or borough school district 01 (A) is calculated by combining 02 (i) the equivalent of a 2.65 mill tax levy on the full and 03 true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of 04 January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the 05 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 06 under AS 14.17.510 and AS 29.45.110, not to exceed the amount 07 calculated under this sub-subparagraph for the preceding fiscal 08 year by more than four percent; and 09 (ii) if the city or borough of the school district 10 collects an alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.030, or if the 11 state collects an alternative volumetric tax on behalf of the city or 12 borough of the school district under AS 43.59.030, an amount equal 13 to a portion of the alternative volumetric tax collected, calculated 14 by multiplying the alternative volumetric tax collected by or on 15 behalf of the city or borough under AS 43.59.030 by 2.65 and 16 dividing the product by the mill rate set out in AS 43.56.010(a); 17 (B) [; THE REQUIRED LOCAL CONTRIBUTION] may not 18 exceed [(A)] 45 percent of a district's basic need for 19 (i) the preceding fiscal year as determined under (1) of 20 this subsection; or 21 (ii) [(B) THE AMOUNT OF THE DISTRICT'S 22 REQUIRED LOCAL CONTRIBUTION FOR] the second preceding 23 fiscal year as determined under (1) of this subsection by more than 24 four percent. 25 * Sec. 3. AS 14.17.410(b), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, is amended to read: 26 (b) Public school funding consists of state aid, a required local contribution, 27 and eligible federal impact aid determined as follows: 28 (1) state aid equals basic need minus a required local contribution and 29 90 percent of eligible federal impact aid for t hat fiscal year; basic need equals the sum 30 obtained under (D) of this paragraph, multiplied by the base student allocation set out 31 in AS 14.17.470; district adjusted ADM is calculated as follows: 01 (A) the ADM of each school in the district is calculated by 02 applying the school size factor to the student count as set out in AS 14.17.450; 03 (B) the number obtained under (A) of this paragraph is 04 multiplied by the district cost factor described in AS 14.17.460; 05 (C) the ADMs of each school in a district, as adjusted 06 according to (A) and (B) of this paragraph, are added; the sum is then 07 multiplied by the special needs factor set out in AS 14.17.420(a)(1) and the 08 secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor set out in 09 AS 14.17.420(a)(3); 10 (D) the number obtained for intensive services under 11 AS 14.17.420(a)(2) and the number obtained for correspondence study under 12 AS 14.17.430 are added to the number obtained under (C) of this paragraph or 13 under (H) and (I) of this paragraph; 14 (E) notwithstanding (A) - (C) of this paragraph, if a school 15 district's ADM adjusted for school size under (A) of this paragraph decreases 16 by five percent or more from one fiscal year to the next fiscal year, the school 17 district may use the last fiscal year before the decrease as a base fiscal year to 18 offset the decrease, according to the following method: 19 (i) for the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year 20 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 21 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 22 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 75 percent of the 23 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 24 base fiscal year and the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 25 (ii) for the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year 26 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 27 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 28 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 50 percent of the 29 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 30 base fiscal year and the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 31 (iii) for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year 01 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 02 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 03 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 25 percent of the 04 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 05 base fiscal year and the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 06 (F) the method established in (E) of this paragraph is available 07 to a school district for the three fiscal years following the base fiscal year 08 determined under (E) of this paragraph only if the district's ADM adjusted for 09 school size determined under (A) of this paragraph for each fiscal year is less 10 than the district's ADM adjusted for school size in the base fiscal year; 11 (G) the method established in (E) of this paragraph does not 12 apply to a decrease in the district's ADM adjusted for school size resulting 13 from a loss of enrollment that occurs as a result of a boundary change under 14 AS 29; 15 (H) notwithstanding (A) - (C) of this paragraph, if one or more 16 schools close and consolidate with one or more other schools in the same 17 community and district and, as a result of the consolidation, basic need 18 generated by the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under 19 (A) - (C) of this paragraph decreases, the district may use the last fiscal year 20 before the consolidation as the base fiscal year to offset that decrease for the 21 first four fiscal years following consolidation according to the following 22 method: 23 (i) for the first two fiscal years after the base fiscal year, 24 the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - 25 (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 26 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 27 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 28 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 29 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the district's ADM of 30 the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under 31 (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's ADM of the 01 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 02 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 03 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, and 04 adding that number to the sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated 05 schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 06 paragraph; 07 (ii) for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year, the 08 district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) 09 of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 10 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 11 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 12 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 13 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the 14 district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as 15 adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's 16 ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, 17 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 18 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 19 multiplying that number by 66 percent, and adding that number to the 20 sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current 21 fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph; 22 (iii) for the fourth fiscal year after the base fiscal year, 23 the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - 24 (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 25 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 26 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 27 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 28 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the 29 district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as 30 adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's 31 ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, 01 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 02 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 03 multiplying that number by 33 percent, and adding that number to the 04 sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current 05 fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph; 06 (iv) to calculate the district's basic need for each fiscal 07 year, the number obtained through the calculation in (i), (ii), or (iii) of 08 this subparagraph is added to the number obtained under (C) of this 09 paragraph for the remainder of the district; 10 (I) if the basic need calculated under (H)(i) - (iii) of this 11 paragraph for one of the first four fiscal years after consolidation is less than 12 the basic need calculated under (A) - (C) of this paragraph for that fiscal year, 13 the basic need may not be adjusted under (H) of this paragraph for that fiscal 14 year; 15 (J) a district may not offset a decrease under (H) of this 16 paragraph if 17 (i) a new facility is constructed in the district for the 18 consolidation; or 19 (ii) the district offset a decrease under (E) of this 20 paragraph in the same fiscal year; 21 (K) a district that offsets a decrease under (H) of this paragraph 22 may not reopen a school that was closed for consolidation in the district until 23 (i) four or more years have passed since the school 24 closure; and 25 (ii) the district provides evidence satisfactory to the 26 department that the schools affected by the consolidation are over 27 capacity; 28 (L) a district may not reopen and reconsolidate a school that 29 was consolidated in the district more than once every four years for purposes 30 of the calculations made under (H) of this paragraph; 31 (M) a district offsetting a decrease under (H) of this paragraph 01 shall provide the department with the list of schools participating in the 02 consolidation and the corresponding ADM; 03 (2) the required local contribution of a city or borough school district 04 [(A)] is [CALCULATED BY COMBINING 05 (i)] the equivalent of a 2.65 mill tax levy on the full and 06 true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of 07 January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the 08 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 09 under AS 14.17.510 and AS 29.45.110; the required local 10 contribution [, NOT TO EXCEED THE AMOUNT CALCULATED 11 UNDER THIS SUB-SUBPARAGRAPH FOR THE PRECEDING 12 FISCAL YEAR BY MORE THAN FOUR PERCENT; AND 13 (ii) IF THE CITY OR BOROUGH OF THE SCHOOL 14 DISTRICT COLLECTS AN ALTERNATIVE VOLUMETRIC TAX 15 UNDER AS 43.59.030, OR IF THE STATE COLLECTS AN 16 ALTERNATIVE VOLUMETRIC TAX ON BEHALF OF THE CITY 17 OR BOROUGH OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT UNDER 18 AS 43.59.030, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO A PORTION OF THE 19 ALTERNATIVE VOLUMETRIC TAX COLLECTED, 20 CALCULATED BY MULTIPLYING THE ALTERNATIVE 21 VOLUMETRIC TAX COLLECTED BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE 22 CITY OR BOROUGH UNDER AS 43.59.030 BY 2.65 AND 23 DIVIDING THE PRODUCT BY THE MILL RATE SET OUT IN 24 AS 43.56.010(a); 25 (B)] may not exceed 26 (A) 45 percent of a district's basic need for 27 [(i)] the preceding fiscal year as determined under (1) of 28 this subsection; or 29 (B) the amount of the district's required local contribution 30 for 31 [(ii)] the [SECOND] preceding fiscal year [AS 01 DETERMINED UNDER (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION] by more than 02 four percent. 03 * Sec. 4. AS 14.17.510 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (d) In this section, the full and true value of the taxable real and personal 05 property does not include property subject to tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 or the 06 alternative volumetric tax levied under AS 43.59.020. 07 * Sec. 5. AS 29.45.030 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 08 (o) Property of a natural gas project subject to tax abatement under 09 AS 43.59.010 or to the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020 is exempt from 10 taxation under AS 29.45. In this subsection, "natural gas project" has the meaning 11 given in AS 43.59.100. 12 * Sec. 6. AS 29.45.080(c) is amended to read: 13 (c) A municipality may levy and collect a tax on the full and true value of that 14 portion of taxable property taxable under AS 43.56 as assessed by the Department of 15 Revenue which value, when combined with the value of property otherwise taxable by 16 the municipality, does not exceed the product of the percentage determined in (f) of 17 this section of the average per capita assessed full and true value of property in the 18 state multiplied by the number of residents of the taxing municipality. Property 19 subject to tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 or to the alternative volumetric tax 20 levied under AS 43.59.020 is not included in the value of property for the purpose 21 of making the calculation under this subsection. 22 * Sec. 7. AS 31.25.010 is amended to read: 23 Sec. 31.25.010. Structure. The Alaska Gasline Development Corporation is a 24 public corporation and government instrumentality acting in the best interest and as a 25 fiduciary of the state for the purposes required by AS 31.25.005, located for 26 administrative purposes in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 27 Development, but having a legal existence independent of and separate from the state. 28 The corporation may not be terminated as long as it has bonds, notes, or other 29 obligations outstanding. The corporation may dissolve when no bonds, notes, or other 30 obligations of the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation are outstanding and 31 the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation is no longer engaged in the 01 development, financing, construction, or operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline 02 or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project. Upon termination of the corporation, its 03 rights and property pass to the state. 04 * Sec. 8. AS 31.25.040(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) The board shall by regulation adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative 06 Procedure Act) adopt and publish procedures to govern the procurement by the 07 corporation of supplies, services, professional services, and construction. The 08 procurement procedures must 09 (1) reflect competitive bidding principles and provide vendors 10 reasonable and equitable opportunities to participate in the procurement 11 process; 12 (2) include procurement methods to meet emergency and 13 extraordinary circumstances; 14 (3) comply with the five percent preference under AS 36.30.321(a); 15 and 16 (4) provide for an Alaska veterans' preference that is consistent with 17 the Alaska veterans' preference in AS 36.30.175. 18 * Sec. 9. AS 31.25.080(a) is amended to read: 19 (a) In addition to other powers granted in this chapter, the corporation may 20 (1) determine the form of ownership and the operating structure of an 21 in-state natural gas pipeline developed by the corporation and may, subject to 22 AS 31.25.120(b), enter into agreements with other persons for joint ownership, joint 23 operation, or both of an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas 24 project; 25 (2) plan, finance, construct, develop, acquire, maintain, and operate a 26 pipeline system and other transportation mechanism, including pipelines, compressors, 27 storage facilities, and other related facilities, equipment, and works of public 28 improvement, in the state to facilitate production, transportation, and delivery of 29 natural gas or other related natural resources to the point of consumption or to the 30 point of distribution for consumption; 31 (3) lease or rent facilities, structures, and properties; 01 (4) exercise the power of eminent domain and file a declaration of 02 taking under AS 09.55.240 - 09.55.460 to acquire land or an interest in land that is 03 necessary for an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; 04 the exercise of powers by the corporation under this paragraph may not exceed the 05 permissible exercise of the powers by the state; 06 (5) acquire, by purchase, lease, or gift, land, structures, real or personal 07 property, an interest in property, a right-of-way, a franchise, an easement, or other 08 interest in land, or an interest in or right to capacity in a pipeline system determined to 09 be necessary or convenient for the development, financing, construction, or operation 10 of an in-state natural gas pipeline project or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project or 11 part of an in-state natural gas pipeline project or an Alaska liquefied natural gas 12 project; 13 (6) subject to AS 31.25.120(b), transfer or otherwise dispose of all or 14 part of an in-state natural gas pipeline project, an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, 15 or an interest in an asset of the corporation; 16 (7) elect to provide transportation of natural gas as a contract carrier, 17 common carrier, or otherwise; 18 (8) provide light, water, security, and other services for property of the 19 corporation; 20 (9) conduct hearings to gather and develop data consistent with the 21 purpose and powers of the corporation; 22 (10) advocate for new pipeline capacity before the Federal Energy 23 Regulatory Commission; 24 (11) make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments 25 necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation 26 under this chapter, including a contract with a person, firm, corporation, governmental 27 agency, or other entity; 28 (12) sue and be sued in its own name; 29 (13) adopt an official seal; 30 (14) adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its 31 business and adopt regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its 01 functions and duties; 02 (15) employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, appraisers, and 03 other consultants and employees that may, in the judgment of the corporation, be 04 required and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the corporation; 05 (16) procure insurance against a loss in connection with its operation; 06 (17) borrow money as provided in this chapter to carry out its 07 corporate purposes and issue its obligations as evidence of borrowing; 08 (18) include in a borrowing the amounts necessary to pay financing 09 charges, to pay interest on the obligations, and to pay the interest, consultant, advisory, 10 and legal fees, and other expenses that are necessary or incident to the borrowing; 11 (19) receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and 12 requirements of an appropriation, gift, grant, or donation of property or money; 13 (20) do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry 14 out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter; 15 (21) invest or reinvest, subject to its contracts with noteholders and 16 bondholders, money or funds held by the corporation, including funds in the [IN- 17 STATE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND (AS 31.25.100) AND THE] Alaska 18 liquefied natural gas project bond fund (AS 31.25.150 [AS 31.25.110]), in obligations 19 or other securities or investments in which banks or trust companies in the state may 20 legally invest funds held in reserves or sinking funds or funds not required for 21 immediate disbursement, and in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by 22 obligations of, or guaranteed by, the state or the United States; 23 (22) enter into, as it determines to be necessary or appropriate, any 24 swap or hedge, cap, or other contract providing for payments based on levels of or 25 changes in interest rates or indices or in the cost or price of any commodity, supply, or 26 expense expected to be used or incurred in connection with the acquisition, 27 construction, or operation of any facility or property owned, leased, or operated by the 28 corporation, or an option with respect to any of the foregoing; 29 (23) except as provided in (g) of this section, acquire an ownership or 30 participation interest in an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, natural gas treatment 31 facilities, natural gas pipeline facilities, liquefaction facilities, marine terminal 01 facilities related to the infrastructure of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, or an 02 entity or joint venture that has an ownership interest in or is engaged in the planning, 03 financing, acquisition, maintenance, construction, and operation of an Alaska liquefied 04 natural gas project; 05 (24) after consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the 06 commissioner of natural resources, enter into contracts relating to an Alaska liquefied 07 natural gas project, including contracts for services related to operation, marketing, 08 transportation, gas treatment, marine terminal operation, or liquefaction. 09 * Sec. 10. AS 31.25.080 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 10 (h) The corporation shall, to the maximum extent possible, use contractors and 11 suppliers in the state in order to benefit from the experience of workers and businesses 12 in the state in arctic engineering and construction. 13 * Sec. 11. AS 31.25.090(f) is amended to read: 14 (f) Subject to the restrictions in this section, the [THE] corporation may 15 enter into confidentiality agreements necessary to acquire or provide information to 16 carry out its functions. If a state agency determines that a law or provision of a 17 contract to which the state agency is a party requires the state agency to preserve the 18 confidentiality of the information and that delivering the information to the 19 corporation would violate the confidentiality provision of that law or contract, the state 20 agency shall 21 (1) identify the applicable law or contract provision to the corporation; 22 and 23 (2) obtain the consent of the person who has the right to waive the 24 confidentiality of the information under the applicable law or contract provision before 25 the state agency transfers the information to the corporation. 26 * Sec. 12. AS 31.25.090 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 27 (j) A confidentiality agreement entered into under (f) of this section may not 28 (1) prevent compliance with an administrative or court order 29 mandating disclosure; 30 (2) make confidential contract terms, or prospective contract terms, 31 that could extend to or encumber the state with fiscal or performance liability, 01 obligation, or risk, either directly or indirectly; 02 (3) except as provided in (k) of this section, make confidential 03 information that may lead to 04 (A) a significant fiscal liability, obligation, or risk to the state; 05 or 06 (B) appropriations or other state funding or in-kind payments 07 or services from the state; 08 (4) make confidential the ownership or management structure of a 09 subsidiary of the corporation; 10 (5) make confidential information related to the existence of a state 11 interest option under AS 31.25.125; or 12 (6) on and after the date the corporation delivers notification of an 13 exercisable option under AS 31.25.125(d), make confidential information related to a 14 revenue-generating project 15 (A) that is provided to other investors in the revenue-generating 16 project; or 17 (B) to which a prudent investor would expect to have access 18 before making an investment decision. 19 (k) A confidentiality agreement entered into under (f) of this section may 20 make confidential specific known or reasonably anticipated project economics or costs 21 related to the Alaska liquefied natural gas project only if 22 (1) one or more parties to the agreement reasonably assert that release 23 of the project economics or costs would cause commercial or competitive harm to an 24 entity involved in the Alaska liquefied natural gas project; and 25 (2) the parties to the contract agree to release reasonable estimated 26 ranges or a summarization of project economics and costs sufficient for a legislator or 27 a public agent to assess the fiscal liability, obligation, or risk to the state, to the extent 28 that the ranges or summarization does not cause commercial or competitive harm to an 29 entity involved in the Alaska liquefied natural gas project. 30 (l) In this section, 31 (1) "public agent" means 01 (A) a public agency, as defined in AS 40.25.220, or an agent or 02 contractor of a public agency; 03 (B) an agent or contractor of a member of the legislature or of a 04 legislative committee; 05 (2) "revenue-generating project" has the meaning given in 06 AS 31.25.125(i). 07 * Sec. 13. AS 31.25.120 is amended to read: 08 Sec. 31.25.120. Creation of subsidiaries. The corporation may create 09 subsidiary corporations for the purpose of developing, constructing, operating, and 10 financing in-state natural gas pipeline projects or other transportation mechanisms; for 11 the purpose of aiding in the development, construction, operation, and financing of in- 12 state natural gas pipeline projects; or for the purpose of acquiring natural gas from the 13 North Slope, and natural gas from other regions of the state, including the state's outer 14 continental shelf, and making that natural gas available to markets in the state, 15 including the delivery of natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons 16 associated with natural gas other than oil, to coastal communities in the state, or for 17 export. Subject to the limitations for the use of money appropriated to [THE IN- 18 STATE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND (AS 31.25.100) AND] the Alaska 19 liquefied natural gas project bond fund (AS 31.25.150 [AS 31.25.110]), the 20 corporation may transfer assets of the corporation to a subsidiary created under this 21 section. A subsidiary created under this section may borrow money and issue bonds as 22 evidence of that borrowing and has all the powers of the corporation that the 23 corporation grants to it. Unless otherwise provided by the corporation, the debts, 24 liabilities, and obligations of a subsidiary corporation created under this section are not 25 the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation. 26 * Sec. 14. AS 31.25.120 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 27 (b) The corporation may transfer, sell, or otherwise dispose of an ownership or 28 management interest in a subsidiary of the corporation only after the legislature has 29 had the opportunity to disapprove the issuance of the transfer, sale, or disposition. 30 Legislative disapproval under this subsection must be by law. The corporation shall 31 notify the presiding officer of each house if the corporation intends to transfer, sell, or 01 otherwise dispose of an ownership or management interest in a subsidiary of the 02 corporation. The legislature shall have 90 days to consider the transfer, sale, or 03 disposition. If the legislature does not disapprove the transfer, sale, or disposition of an 04 ownership interest within 90 days, the corporation may move forward with the 05 transfer, sale, or disposition. 06 * Sec. 15. AS 31.25 is amended by adding a new section to read: 07 Sec. 31.25.125. Involvement in revenue-generating projects. (a) If the 08 corporation negotiates with another entity for participation by the corporation in a 09 revenue-generating project, the corporation shall negotiate an option for the state or, 10 subject to (h) of this section, a municipality to acquire an interest in the project. The 11 corporation shall immediately notify the president of the senate, the speaker of the 12 house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of each house of the 13 legislature on each occasion that an option for the state is available for consideration 14 by the legislature under (b)(1) of this section. 15 (b) An option exercisable under this section 16 (1) by the state must, before being exercised, be approved by the 17 legislature by law; and 18 (2) must allow the state or a municipality at least 180 days to exercise 19 the option after notification of the legislature under (d) of this section. 20 (c) At the request of the legislature, a state agency shall cooperate with and 21 assist the legislature in determining whether to approve under (b)(1) of this section the 22 terms of an option for the state negotiated under (a) of this section. 23 (d) The corporation shall immediately notify the president of the senate, the 24 speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of 25 each house of the legislature on each occasion that the state may exercise an option 26 negotiated under (a) of this section. 27 (e) The state may not acquire an interest in a revenue-generating project under 28 this section unless the interest is approved by the legislature by law. When making an 29 investment decision under this section, the legislature shall act as a prudent investor. 30 (f) The Department of Revenue shall cooperate with and assist the legislature 31 in determining whether to acquire an interest in a revenue-generating project under (e) 01 of this section by exercising an option negotiated under (a) of this section, including 02 by identifying potential funding sources for exercising the option and potential fiscal 03 effects on the state. If requested by the legislature, another state agency shall cooperate 04 with and assist the legislature with making a determination under (e) of this section. 05 (g) The corporation, and any other entity participating in a revenue-generating 06 project, shall 07 (1) cooperate with and assist the legislature in determining whether to 08 approve the terms of an option negotiated under (a) of this section or to acquire an 09 interest in the project by exercising an option negotiated under this section; 10 (2) provide information requested by the legislature related to the 11 project, including 12 (A) information necessary for the legislature to act as a prudent 13 investor; and 14 (B) financial records of or related to the revenue-generating 15 project; and 16 (3) ensure that at least one representative of the corporation and of 17 each participating entity are available to testify during public hearings of legislative 18 committees requesting testimony. 19 (h) If the corporation negotiates with another entity for participation by the 20 corporation in a revenue-generating project under (a) of this section, the corporation 21 shall provide an opportunity for municipalities in the state to purchase a portion of the 22 corporation's right to acquire additional equity interest in the natural gas project not 23 exercised by the corporation, through an entity managed by the corporation. A 24 municipality may not acquire a direct interest in a revenue-generating project under 25 this subsection. 26 (i) In this section, 27 (1) "corporation" includes a subsidiary of the corporation; 28 (2) "revenue-generating project" means a project, entity ownership, 29 legal business arrangement, partnership, joint venture, or other commercial endeavor 30 expected to generate revenue. 31 * Sec. 16. AS 31.25.130(a) is amended to read: 01 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and except for 02 AS 44.62.310 - 44.62.319 (Open Meetings Act), AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure 03 Act) does not apply to this chapter. The corporation shall make available to members 04 of the public copies of the regulations adopted under (b) - (e) of this section. 05 * Sec. 17. AS 31.25.140(c) is amended to read: 06 (c) To further ensure effective budgetary decision making by the legislature, 07 the board shall 08 (1) annually review the corporation's assets, including the assets of 09 [THE IN-STATE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND UNDER AS 31.25.100 AND] 10 the Alaska liquefied natural gas project bond fund under AS 31.25.150 11 [AS 31.25.110], to determine whether assets of the corporation exceed an amount 12 required to fulfill the purposes of the corporation as defined in this chapter; in making 13 its review, the board shall determine whether, and to what extent, assets in excess of 14 the amount required to fulfill the purposes of the corporation during the next fiscal 15 year are available without 16 (A) breaching an agreement entered into by the corporation; 17 (B) materially impairing the operations or financial integrity of 18 the corporation; or 19 (C) materially affecting the ability of the corporation to fulfill 20 the purposes of the corporation as defined in this chapter; 21 (2) specifically identify in the corporation's assets the amounts that the 22 board believes are necessary to meet the requirements of (1)(C) of this subsection; and 23 (3) present to the legislature by January 10 of each year a complete 24 accounting of all assets of the corporation, including assets of [THE IN-STATE 25 NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND UNDER AS 31.25.100 AND] the Alaska 26 liquefied natural gas project bond fund under AS 31.25.150 [AS 31.25.110], and a 27 report of the review and determination made under (1) and (2) of this subsection; the 28 accounting shall be audited by an independent outside auditor. 29 * Sec. 18. AS 31.25 is amended by adding new sections to article 1 to read: 30 Sec. 31.25.145. Accounting. (a) The corporation shall deposit into separate 31 accounts in the general fund revenue 01 (1) generated by a subsidiary of the corporation; and 02 (2) resulting from an option negotiated under AS 31.25.125. 03 (b) The legislature may appropriate the annual estimated amount necessary for 04 the payment of obligations associated with bonds issued by the corporation to the 05 Alaska liquefied natural gas project bond fund (AS 31.25.150). 06 Sec. 31.25.150. Alaska liquefied natural gas project bond fund. The Alaska 07 liquefied natural gas project bond fund is established in the corporation and consists of 08 money appropriated to the fund. The corporation shall determine fund management 09 and may contract with the Department of Revenue for fund management. The 10 corporation may use money in the fund without further appropriation for the purpose 11 of paying obligations associated with bonds issued by the corporation. 12 Sec. 31.25.155. Prohibition on seeking recourse for failure or 13 abandonment of the project. An entity in a legal relationship with the corporation 14 that is acting as a lead party for development of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project 15 may not seek financial recourse or a claim for monetary reimbursement from the 16 corporation or the state based on the failure or abandonment of the project by the 17 entity. If, within a reasonable time frame, the entity acting as a lead party fails to 18 continue diligent development efforts or fails to meet a key milestone, including an 19 agreed-on clawback milestone or production of a front-end engineering design work 20 product related to a subproject, or fails to make a final investment decision on a 21 subproject, the ownership shares of the partnership or applicable subproject of the 22 entity acting as the lead party shall, within six months of the failed action or 23 abandonment of the Alaska liquefied natural gas project, revert or be transferred to the 24 corporation or another department or instrumentality of the state at no cost to the 25 corporation or the state. The corporation or the state may not be required by contract 26 to purchase the interest of an entity acting as a lead party in a subproject that fails to 27 reach a final investment decision. In this section, "subproject" means a natural gas 28 pipeline, gas treatment plant, or Alaska liquefied natural gas project facility. 29 * Sec. 19. AS 31.25.160 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 30 (g) The corporation shall immediately notify the president of the senate, the 31 speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of 01 each house of the legislature on each occasion on which the corporation intends to 02 issue bonds. The corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, may issue bonds only 03 after the legislature approves the issuance of the bonds by law. The legislature shall 04 have 90 days after the notification under this subsection to approve the issuance of the 05 bonds. If the legislature does not approve the issuance of the bonds within 90 days, the 06 corporation may not issue the bonds. The limitation in this subsection does not apply 07 to refunding bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued without further approval by the 08 legislature in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all 09 bonds to be refunded by the refunding bonds and, in addition, for the payment of all 10 other amounts that the corporation considers appropriate in connection with the 11 refunding, including expenses incident to the redeeming, calling, retiring, or paying of 12 the outstanding bonds, the funding of reserves, and the issuance of the refunding 13 bonds. 14 * Sec. 20. AS 31.25.270 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 15 (d) By February 15 and August 15 of each year, the board shall deliver a 16 report on natural gas pipeline projects in the state to the commissioner of revenue, 17 notify the governor and the legislature that the report is available, and publish notice to 18 the public on the Alaska Online Public Notice System under AS 44.62.175 that the 19 report is available on the corporation's Internet website. The board shall prepare the 20 report regardless of whether the corporation owns or operates the projects. The report 21 must 22 (1) provide a current status of natural gas projects in the state, 23 including construction status, projected timeline for completion, and a 24 description of any remaining phases of construction; 25 (2) provide a qualitative assessment and update of the timeline, budget, 26 and cost containment progress since the last report; 27 (3) provide an assessment of the effect of the projects on the state labor 28 market, including 29 (A) the number of jobs created or affected, listed by region of 30 the state; 31 (B) the total estimated payroll dollars attributable to the 01 projects since the last report; and 02 (C) the proportion of resident and nonresident employees or 03 contractors working on the projects; 04 (4) set out secured intake and offtake contracts, by annual volume; and 05 (5) provide total capital expenditures for each major component of the 06 projects; an entity invested in a project with the corporation shall provide to the 07 corporation the information necessary to meet the requirements of this paragraph; in 08 this paragraph, "capital expenditure" means a cost that is properly chargeable to a 09 capital account under federal income tax principals, as determined at the time the 10 property is paid for. 11 (e) The corporation shall maintain on the corporation's Internet website a 12 publicly accessible dashboard for project accountability for each natural gas pipeline 13 project. The dashboard must 14 (1) show the status of each major phase of the project, including front- 15 end and preliminary front-end engineering design, permits, financing, final investment 16 decision, notice to proceed, procurement, construction, startup, commercial 17 operations, phase two final investment decision, expansion, and decommissioning 18 planning; 19 (2) if the state exercises an option to invest in the natural gas pipeline 20 project, include the public cost estimate range, estimate class if available, schedule 21 baseline, current forecast, and summary explanation of material changes or variances; 22 (3) include a material risk register and mitigation status; 23 (4) provide the status of permitting and rights-of-way; 24 (5) include information on 25 (A) gas supply and offtake status by aggregate annual volume; 26 and 27 (B) in-state gas delivery and ratepayer protection status; 28 (6) include the status of the spur line, as defined in AS 42.05.438; 29 (7) include the status of community impact grants and mitigation; 30 (8) provide information regarding the number and proportion of state 31 resident hires and resident contractor or supplier participation; 01 (9) be updated at least monthly before commencement of commercial 02 operations of the natural gas pipeline project and at least quarterly thereafter; and 03 (10) be updated within 10 business days after the corporation becomes 04 aware of a material change affecting cost, schedule, financing, permitting, in-state gas 05 delivery, ratepayer protection, community impacts, state fiscal exposure, or other 06 public-interest issue affecting the natural gas pipeline project. 07 (f) The corporation may use reasonable redactions, estimated ranges, 08 summaries, or status indicators to protect confidential or commercially sensitive 09 information on the dashboard required by (e) of this section. 10 (g) The corporation shall preserve dashboard updates made under (e) of this 11 section in a public archive on the corporation's Internet website, with date-stamped 12 changes and version history. 13 (h) A project developer shall provide to the corporation the information 14 required for the dashboard under (e) of this section. In this subsection, "project 15 developer" means an entity responsible for coordinating the financing and construction 16 of a natural gas pipeline project. 17 (i) In this section, 18 (1) "natural gas pipeline project" includes the Alaska liquefied natural 19 gas project or a similar project; 20 (2) "major component of the project" means a natural gas treatment 21 facility, carbon capture or underground storage facility, liquefaction facility, import or 22 export facility, or any other major facility associated with a natural gas pipeline 23 project. 24 * Sec. 21. AS 31.25 is amended by adding new sections to read: 25 Sec. 31.25.280. Relationships with foreign entities. (a) The corporation shall 26 promptly provide written notice to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house 27 of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of each house of the 28 legislature if the corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, enters into a legal 29 relationship with a foreign entity, either directly or indirectly through another person 30 or entity. The notification under this section must 31 (1) be provided at least quarterly on the calendar year; 01 (2) include 02 (A) the full legal name of the foreign entity; 03 (B) a description of the legal relationship and any project 04 related to the legal relationship; 05 (C) the name of at least one individual authorized to bind the 06 foreign entity on matters related to the legal relationship; 07 (D) the physical address of the primary business operations of 08 the foreign entity; and 09 (E) the date the legal relationship was entered into. 10 (b) In addition to providing notification under (a) of this section, the 11 corporation shall ensure that an agent of the corporation or a subsidiary of the 12 corporation, if requested, is available to testify relating to the legal relationship during 13 one or more public hearings of legislative committees requesting testimony. 14 (c) In this section, 15 (1) "legal relationship" means a partnership, joint venture, joint 16 ownership agreement, merger, or other legal agreement made for the purpose of 17 investing in, obtaining monetary returns from, or obtaining an ownership interest in 18 (A) a project developed by the corporation or a subsidiary of 19 the corporation; 20 (B) a project in which the corporation or a subsidiary of the 21 corporation has an ownership or management interest; or 22 (C) an entity engaged in a project described in (A) or (B) of 23 this paragraph; 24 (2) "subsidiary of the corporation" includes, notwithstanding the 25 definition given in AS 31.25.390, a subsidiary that is partially owned by the 26 corporation, even if the subsidiary is not controlled by the corporation. 27 Sec. 31.25.285. Legislative notification of ownership change. (a) The 28 corporation shall promptly notify the president of the senate, the speaker of the house 29 of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of each house of the 30 legislature if 31 (1) the corporation becomes aware that an entity in a legal relationship 01 with the corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, plans to make a significant 02 change in ownership structure; or 03 (2) an entity in a legal relationship with the corporation, or a subsidiary 04 of the corporation, has a significant change in ownership structure. 05 (b) In this section, "legal relationship" means a partnership, joint venture, joint 06 ownership agreement, or other legally binding business arrangement 07 (1) of which the corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, has at 08 least a 10 percent interest; or 09 (2) that has an interest in a third entity in which the corporation, or a 10 subsidiary of the corporation, also has at least a 10 percent interest; and 11 (3) that formed for the purpose of shared ownership or shared 12 management of, or pooling of resources for, an entity in which the corporation, or a 13 subsidiary of the corporation, has an ownership or management interest. 14 * Sec. 22. AS 31.25.390 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 15 (8) "subsidiary of the corporation" means a subsidiary controlled by 16 the corporation. 17 * Sec. 23. AS 37.05 is amended by adding a new section to article 6 to read: 18 Sec. 37.05.615. Alaska affordable heating fuel fund. (a) The Alaska 19 affordable heating fuel fund is created as a separate fund in the state treasury. The 20 fund consists of the amount determined and deposited in the fund under (b) of this 21 section and interest earned on the fund balance. 22 (b) The amount to be deposited in (a) of this section is 20 percent of the 23 revenue received from the state's royalty gas transported in an Alaska liquefied natural 24 gas project that remains after the payment to the Alaska permanent fund under 25 AS 37.13.010. The deposit made under this section may not interfere with the deposit 26 to the Alaska affordable energy fund (AS 37.05.610) or the contribution to the public 27 school trust fund (AS 37.14.150). 28 (c) The legislature may make appropriations from the Alaska affordable 29 heating fuel fund to fund programs that will reduce the cost of heating fuel in areas of 30 the state that are not expected to have or do not have direct access to a North Slope 31 natural gas pipeline. 01 (d) Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund. 02 (e) In this section, 03 (1) "Alaska liquefied natural gas project" has the meaning given in 04 AS 31.25.390; 05 (2) "North Slope natural gas pipeline" has the meaning given in 06 AS 42.06.630. 07 * Sec. 24. AS 42.05 is amended by adding new sections to read: 08 Sec. 42.05.435. Alaska liquefied natural gas project gas supply contracts. 09 (a) The commission may not approve a gas supply contract between a public utility 10 and an owner or operator of a gas pipeline advanced, operated, or owned, in whole or 11 in part, by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, or a subsidiary of the 12 corporation, that obligates the utility to pay more than $16 for each 1,000,000 British 13 thermal units of natural gas. 14 (b) Each year, after the effective date of this section, the commission shall 15 adjust the dollar amount in (a) of this section on January 1 of each year for inflation, 16 using 100 percent of the average of the annual change over the preceding five calendar 17 years in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, as 18 determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. The 19 annual inflation adjustment under this subsection must increase the dollar amount in 20 (a) of this section by at least one percent and not more than three percent or by the 21 percentage increase set out in the terms of the gas supply contract, whichever is less. A 22 public utility may not increase the cost to a customer as a charge for inflation by more 23 than the amount of the inflation adjustment. 24 (c) In this section, "gas pipeline" has the meaning given in AS 31.25.390. 25 Sec. 42.05.438. Alaska liquefied natural gas project utility contract 26 requirements. (a) In addition to other approval requirements under this chapter, a 27 public utility must obtain the approval of the commission to recover costs related to a 28 contract with a duration of more than one year that reserves capacity in a gas pipeline 29 or liquefied natural gas plant. In this subsection, "contract" includes any agreement 30 that contains conditions that must be satisfied before the agreement becomes effective. 31 (b) The commission may not approve a gas supply contract for natural gas 01 transported by a gas pipeline, or a contract that requires approval under (a) of this 02 section, that 03 (1) recovers costs from customers of a utility resulting from cost 04 overruns from construction of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; or 05 (2) increases a commission-approved rate if throughput decreases. 06 (c) In this section, 07 (1) "Alaska liquefied natural gas project" has the meaning given in 08 AS 31.25.390; 09 (2) "cost overrun" means a cost in excess of the lowest firm dollar 10 amount demonstrated in an original cost estimate, relevant to an initial determination 11 of a final investment decision, as provided by the developer of an Alaska liquefied 12 natural gas project to a potential owner of or investor in the project for the purpose of 13 acquiring an interest in one or more components of the in-state phase of the project or 14 provided to a potential lending entity for the purpose of extending a loan to the 15 developer to own or construct phase one of the project; when a cost estimate under this 16 paragraph is determined separately for each component of the in-state phase of an 17 Alaska liquefied natural gas project, the relevant cost for review by the commission 18 shall be the sum of the respective two lowest firm dollar amounts demonstrated for 19 each component; 20 (3) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of an 21 Alaska liquefied natural gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project 22 owner to proceed from the planning phase to the implementation and construction 23 phase of the applicable phase of the project; a final investment decision has not been 24 made until the project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 25 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing 26 required to construct the applicable phase of the project; 27 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and 28 construction agreements for construction of the applicable phase of the project; 29 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 30 construction and operation of the applicable phase of the project; 31 (D) completed a cost estimate for the applicable phase of the 01 project; 02 (E) completed a final resource report of the applicable phase of 03 the project; 04 (4) "gas pipeline" and "liquefied natural gas plant" mean a gas pipeline 05 or liquefied natural gas plant associated with an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; 06 "gas pipeline" does not include a spur line; 07 (5) "in-state phase" means the phase of the Alaska liquefied natural gas 08 project made up of the following components: 09 (A) a gas pipeline constructed to transport natural gas from the 10 North Slope to the Southcentral region of the state to service a regulated utility 11 serving the greater Anchorage area; and 12 (B) a gas treatment plant constructed or maintained to treat gas 13 supplied to a gas pipeline constructed under (A) of this paragraph. 14 (6) "spur line" 15 (A) means 16 (i) a natural gas transmission or lateral line that 17 branches from the main gas pipeline for the primary purpose of 18 delivering natural gas to a local community or utility distribution 19 system; and 20 (ii) compressing and metering equipment and 21 interconnection facilities related to the transmission or lateral line 22 described in (i) of this subparagraph; 23 (B) does not include infrastructure used for the export of 24 natural gas or lateral lines not necessary for delivering natural gas to a local 25 community or utility distribution system. 26 * Sec. 25. AS 43.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 27 Sec. 43.20.019. Tax on income of certain oil and gas pass-through entities. 28 (a) Each taxable year, a tax is imposed on the entire taxable income derived from 29 sources in the state of every qualified entity. The tax is computed as follows: 30 If the taxable income is: Then the tax is: 31 Less than $1,000,000 zero 01 $1,000,000 but less than $2,000,000 5 percent of the 02 taxable income over $1,000,000 03 $2,000,000 but less than $3,000,000 $50,000 plus 6 percent of the 04 taxable income over $2,000,000 05 $3,000,000 but less than $4,000,000 $110,000 plus 7 percent of the 06 taxable income over $3,000,000 07 $4,000,000 but less than $5,000,000 $180,000 plus 8 percent of the 08 taxable income over $4,000,000 09 $5,000,000 or more $260,000 plus 9.4 percent of the 10 taxable income over $5,000,000. 11 (b) For purposes of calculating taxable income under this section, 12 (1) taxable income of a qualified entity shall be apportioned to this 13 state in accordance with AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) as modified, where 14 applicable, by AS 43.20.141 - 43.20.146 as if the qualified entity were taxable as a C 15 corporation, as defined by 26 U.S.C. 1361(a)(2) (Internal Revenue Code), as that 16 section read on January 1, 2026; 17 (2) notwithstanding AS 43.20.021 and AS 43.20.036, a qualified entity 18 may not apply as a credit or deduction against tax liability a credit or deduction 19 allowed as to federal taxes under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), except that the 20 qualified entity may take a credit or deduction allowed for a C corporation under (1) of 21 this subsection. 22 (c) The tax under this section does not apply to a corporation subject to tax 23 under AS 43.20.011 or to an entity that is part of a unitary business with a corporation 24 subject to tax under AS 43.20.011. 25 (d) A public corporation is exempt from the tax under this section. If a 26 qualified entity is held in part by a public corporation, income in proportion to the 27 ownership interest held by the public corporation is exempt from the tax under this 28 section. The department may direct each owner of a qualified entity that is owned in 29 part by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation (AS 31.25) to file a return with 30 the department. Notwithstanding AS 40.25.100(a) and AS 43.05.230(a), a return filed 31 by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation under this subsection is a public 01 record and is not confidential. 02 (e) For the purpose of determining the tax due under this section, the 03 department shall 04 (1) aggregate the taxable income of two or more entities if the 05 department determines that, without the provisions of this section, the taxable income 06 would reasonably be expected to be attributed to a single entity; 07 (2) except as provided in (c) of this section, include in the calculation 08 of taxable income of the qualified entity income that is attributable to an entity that is 09 part of a unitary business with the qualified entity paying tax under this section; and 10 (3) adopt regulations to prevent evasion of taxes imposed under this 11 section. 12 (f) For purposes of calculating income under this section, a qualified entity 13 may deduct from income a payment to the shareholder, owner, member, or partner of 14 the qualified entity, if 15 (1) the shareholder, owner, member, or partner is a taxpayer under this 16 chapter; 17 (2) the payment does not include a transfer of property; 18 (3) the payment is included in the shareholder's, owner's, member's, or 19 partner's income for purposes of this chapter; and 20 (4) the payment was not made with the specific intent to reduce or 21 evade the payment of tax under this chapter. 22 (g) In this section, 23 (1) "carbon capture" and "carbon storage" have the meanings given in 24 AS 43.55.165(e)(23); 25 (2) "pipeline" means a pipeline that transports oil or gas from north of 26 68 degrees North latitude to a location outside of the lease or property where the oil or 27 gas is produced for the direct purpose of sale and delivery of the oil or gas to a 28 commercial market; 29 (3) "qualified entity" 30 (A) means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability 31 company, or entity that has elected to file federal returns under 26 U.S.C. 1361 01 - 1379 (Internal Revenue Code) that 02 (i) has taxable income; 03 (ii) owns, operates, manages, or controls an entity that 04 has taxable income; 05 (iii) holds an ownership, investment, or similar interest 06 in an entity that has taxable income; or 07 (iv) owns an operating right, operating interest, or 08 working interest in a mineral interest of an entity with taxable income; 09 (B) does not include a natural person; 10 (4) "taxable income" means income 11 (A) from the production of oil or gas from a lease or property 12 in the state; 13 (B) from the transportation of oil or gas by pipeline in the state; 14 (C) from the supply of oil or gas for transportation by pipeline 15 in the state, whether directly, to an intermediary, or as an intermediary; 16 (D) from gas treatment, carbon capture, or carbon storage 17 activities in the state; 18 (E) from liquefied natural gas processing in the state; 19 (F) from the marine transportation of liquefied natural gas 20 produced in the state; and 21 (G) of an entity that is part of a unitary business with a carrier 22 or producer paying tax under this section as provided under (e)(2) of this 23 section. 24 * Sec. 26. AS 43.20.030(a) is amended to read: 25 (a) If a taxpayer [CORPORATION], or a partnership that has a taxpayer 26 [CORPORATION] as a partner, is required to make a return under the provisions of 27 the Internal Revenue Code, the taxpayer [IT] shall file with the department, within 30 28 days after the federal return is required to be filed, a return setting out 29 (1) the amount of tax due under this chapter, less credits claimed 30 against the tax; and 31 (2) other information for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of 01 this chapter that the department requires. 02 * Sec. 27. AS 43.20.031(i) is amended to read: 03 (i) A taxpayer that [CORPORATION WHICH] is a member of a group of 04 unitary corporations or entities that [WHICH] collectively has income from business 05 activity taxable both inside and outside the state, or income from other sources both 06 inside and outside the state, shall determine its income from sources in this state by 07 use of the combined method of accounting. 08 * Sec. 28. AS 43.56.010(a) is amended to read: 09 (a) Except as provided in AS 43.59.010 and 43.59.020, an [AN] annual tax 10 of 20 mills is levied each tax year beginning January 1, 1974, on the full and true 11 value of taxable property taxable under this chapter. 12 * Sec. 29. AS 43.56.020(d) is amended to read: 13 (d) Taxable property subject to tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 or the 14 volumetric tax imposed under AS 43.59.020 [OF A NATURAL GAS PIPELINE 15 PROJECT OWNED OR FINANCED BY THE ALASKA GASLINE 16 DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION OR A JOINT VENTURE, PARTNERSHIP, OR 17 OTHER ENTITY THAT INCLUDES THE ALASKA GASLINE DEVELOPMENT 18 CORPORATION] is exempt from state taxes levied or authorized under 19 AS 43.56.010(a) and municipal taxes levied or authorized under AS 43.56.010(b) 20 [BEFORE THE COMMENCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL OPERATIONS OF THAT 21 NATURAL GAS PIPELINE PROJECT. IN THIS SUBSECTION, 22 "COMMENCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL OPERATIONS" MEANS THE FIRST 23 FLOW OF NATURAL GAS IN THE PROJECT THAT GENERATES REVENUE 24 TO THE OWNERS OF THE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE PROJECT]. 25 * Sec. 30. AS 43 is amended by adding a new chapter to read: 26 Chapter 59. Natural Gas Project Temporary Tax Abatement and Volumetric Tax. 27 Sec. 43.59.010. Temporary tax abatement. Property of a natural gas project 28 is not subject to the taxes levied under AS 29.45.080, AS 43.56.010, or AS 43.59.020 29 during the temporary tax abatement period. The abatement period begins on the 30 effective date of this section and ends on the earlier of 31 (1) the first day of a consecutive 30-day period in which the natural 01 gas project achieves a throughput of 500,000,000 cubic feet of natural gas a day, 02 calculated as a rolling average over the 30-day period; or 03 (2) five years after the date of commencement of commercial 04 operations of phase one of the natural gas project. 05 Sec. 43.59.020. Imposition of alternative volumetric tax. (a) The owner of 06 property subject to tax under this section shall pay an alternative volumetric tax on the 07 throughput of the property. The alternative volumetric tax applies beginning on the 08 day after the expiration of the abatement period under AS 43.59.010. 09 (b) The volumetric tax is 10 (1) $0.062 for each 1,000 cubic feet of natural gas before 11 commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied natural gas plant related to the 12 natural gas project; 13 (2) $0.106 for each 1,000 cubic feet of natural gas on and after 14 commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied natural gas plant related to the 15 natural gas project; 16 (3) beginning 10 years after commencement of commercial operations 17 of a liquefied natural gas plant related to the natural gas project, in addition to the 18 amount collected under (2) of this subsection, an additional $0.106 for each 1,000 19 cubic feet of natural gas; 20 (4) beginning January 1, 2060, in addition to the amounts collected 21 under (2) and (3) of this subsection, an additional $0.212 for each 1,000 cubic feet of 22 natural gas. 23 (c) Beginning after the first year the tax applies to throughput of a natural gas 24 project under (b)(1) of this section, the tax rates under (b) of this section shall be 25 adjusted on January 1 of each year for inflation, using 100 percent of the average of 26 the annual change over the preceding five calendar years in the Consumer Price Index 27 for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, as determined by the United States 28 Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. However, the annual adjustment 29 under this subsection must increase the rates by at least one percent and not more than 30 three percent. Each tax rate under (b) of this section shall be adjusted for inflation 31 under this subsection even if the tax rate does not yet apply. 01 (d) An owner of property subject to tax under this section shall, on or before 02 the last day of each month, file a return with the department and with each 03 municipality collecting tax under this section. The return must state the throughput, in 04 cubic feet of natural gas for each day, of property subject to tax for the month 05 preceding the month in which the return is due and include an installment payment for 06 the month of the return. An installment payment is considered delinquent if the 07 payment is not received by the department on or before the last day of each month. 08 (e) The tax levied under this section is due annually, on the calendar year. The 09 owner of the property shall, on or before April 30 each year, pay any remaining tax 10 due under this section for tax accruing from throughput in the previous calendar year. 11 A tax payment under this subsection is considered delinquent if the payment is not 12 received by the department on or before April 30 each year. 13 (f) Notwithstanding AS 43.05.220, if a tax payment or installment payment 14 required under this section is delinquent, the department or a municipality shall assess 15 a penalty of 15 percent of the amount of delinquent taxes and interest on the 16 delinquent taxes, exclusive of penalty, at the rate specified in AS 43.05.225. 17 Sec. 43.59.030. Collection and allocation of alternative tax. (a) The 18 department shall levy and collect the alternative volumetric tax imposed by this 19 chapter that is allocated to the state. Unless otherwise elected by the municipality 20 under (h) of this section, a municipality that is not in the unorganized borough may 21 levy and collect the portion of the alternative volumetric tax imposed by this chapter 22 that is allocated to the municipality. The amount of tax allocated to each municipality 23 and to the state is determined under (b) - (f) of this section. 24 (b) Before commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied natural gas 25 plant related to a natural gas project, 26 (1) six percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(1) is allocated to the 27 North Slope Borough; 28 (2) 47 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(1) is allocated to the 29 areas of the state through which a gas pipeline runs; and 30 (3) 47 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(1) is allocated to the 31 state for community assistance payments. 01 (c) On and after the commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied 02 natural gas plant related to a natural gas project, 03 (1) 48.4 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 04 Kenai Peninsula Borough; 05 (2) 27 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 06 North Slope Borough; 07 (3) 5.6 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 08 state; 09 (4) 9.5 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 10 areas of the state through which a gas pipeline runs; 11 (5) 9.5 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 12 state for community assistance payments; 13 (6) 100 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(3) is allocated to the 14 state for community assistance payments; and 15 (7) 100 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(4) is allocated to the 16 state. 17 (d) For purposes of (b)(2) and (c)(4) of this section, the portion allocated to 18 the state is equal to the proportion of the gas pipeline in the unorganized borough, and 19 the portion allocated to each municipality that is not in the unorganized borough is 20 equal to the proportion of the gas pipeline in the municipality. To determine the 21 proportional distribution under this subsection, the length of pipeline in the 22 unorganized borough or a municipality that is not in the unorganized borough is 23 divided by the total length of the pipeline. 24 (e) Each year, the legislature may appropriate the amount allocated to the state 25 under (b)(3), (c)(5), and (c)(6) of this section to the municipalities, communities, and 26 reserves in the unorganized borough, distributed as community assistance payments in 27 accordance with AS 29.60.855 and 29.60.860. 28 (f) The amount of tax allocated to the state under (c)(3) and (7) of this section 29 shall be deposited into the general fund. 30 (g) Each month, the department shall report to a municipality collecting tax 31 under this section the amount of tax allocated to the municipality for the preceding 01 month. 02 (h) A municipality may by ordinance elect for the department to collect, on 03 behalf of the municipality, the portion of the tax levied under this chapter that is 04 allocated to the municipality. 05 Sec. 43.59.040. Administrative appeals; distraint of property. (a) A 06 decision by the department regarding the imposition or calculation of the tax levied 07 under AS 43.59.020 may be appealed to the department for an informal conference 08 under AS 43.05.240, and a final decision may be appealed to the office of 09 administrative hearings under AS 43.05.405. 10 (b) The remedy of distraint of property set out in AS 43.20.270 applies to the 11 tax levied in this chapter. However, only the property subject to tax under 12 AS 43.59.020 may be distrained. 13 Sec. 43.59.050. Termination of status; application. (a) The tax abatement 14 under AS 43.59.010 and the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020 do not 15 apply to a natural gas project if, by 16 (1) January 1, 2028, a final investment decision has not been made on 17 phase one of the natural gas project; 18 (2) December 31, 2032, construction of a gas pipeline associated with 19 phase one of the natural gas project has not been completed; 20 (3) January 1, 2037, at least one major component of the natural gas 21 project has not been completed and commencement of commercial operations of that 22 component has not occurred. 23 (b) The commissioner may reasonably extend a date set out under (a) of this 24 section in the event of force majeure. 25 (c) If, under (a) of this section, neither the tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 26 nor the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020 applies to property of a natural 27 gas project, the property is subject to all other state and municipal taxes on taxable 28 property, including taxes levied under AS 29.45.080 and AS 43.56.010. 29 (d) In this section, 30 (1) "commencement of construction" means the 31 (A) laying and welding together in an excavated trench 01 multiple sections of steel pipe that are intended for use as part of the gas 02 pipeline; and 03 (B) establishment of at least one work camp along the gas 04 pipeline route that is intended to provide crew quarters and services during 05 construction of the gas pipeline; 06 (2) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of a 07 natural gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner to proceed 08 from the planning phase to the implementation and construction phase of phase one of 09 the natural gas project; a final investment decision has not been made until the project 10 developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 11 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing 12 required to construct phase one of the project; 13 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and 14 construction agreements for construction of phase one of the project; 15 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 16 construction and operation of phase one of the project; 17 (D) completed a cost estimate for phase one of the project; 18 (E) completed a final resource report of phase one of the 19 project. 20 Sec. 43.59.060. Reporting; regulations. (a) The owner of property subject to 21 tax under this chapter shall, at the request of the department, provide to the department 22 the information necessary to calculate the tax under this chapter. Notwithstanding 23 AS 40.25.100(a) and AS 43.05.230, the department shall hold confidential proprietary 24 information provided to the department under this subsection at the request of the 25 owner. In this subsection, "proprietary information" means information that, if 26 publicly disclosed, would adversely affect the competitive position of the owner or 27 materially diminish the commercial value of the information to the owner. 28 (b) The department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative 29 Procedure Act) to implement this chapter, including procedures for 30 (1) measuring throughput; 31 (2) throughput reporting; 01 (3) calculating the rolling average of throughput; and 02 (4) allocating the tax levied under this chapter to the state and 03 municipalities under AS 43.59.030. 04 Sec. 43.59.100. Definitions. In this chapter, 05 (1) "commencement of commercial operations" means the first flow of 06 natural gas through a natural gas project or a component of a natural gas project, as 07 applicable, that treats, transports, or processes a commercial amount of natural gas; 08 (2) "gas pipeline" 09 (A) means a main natural gas pipeline from the outlet flange of 10 the gas treatment plant on the North Slope to 11 (i) for purposes of phase one of the project, the inlet 12 flange of infrastructure providing natural gas to the Southcentral region 13 of the state; 14 (ii) for purposes of phase two of the project, the inlet 15 flange of the liquefied natural gas plant located in the Kenai Peninsula 16 region of the state; 17 (B) does not include any gas lines downstream of any offtake 18 point between a gas treatment plant and a liquefied natural gas plant; 19 (3) "gas treatment plant" means a facility and the related activities 20 required to receive natural gas from a Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line, a Point 21 Thomson unit gas transmission line, or other facilities, to treat the natural gas to 22 pipeline specifications, to dispose of or deliver byproducts, to deliver liquid products 23 for further transportation, and to deliver treated natural gas for transportation through a 24 gas pipeline; 25 (4) "liquefied natural gas plant" means a facility for liquefying natural 26 gas and includes structures, equipment, underlying land rights, and other associated 27 systems, storage, and facilities for off-loading liquefied natural gas; 28 (5) "natural gas project" and "project" means a natural gas project that 29 includes, collectively, a Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line, a Point Thomson unit 30 gas transmission line, a gas pipeline, a gas treatment plant, a liquefied natural gas 31 plant, and a marine terminal; in this paragraph, 01 (A) "marine terminal" means a terminal and those facilities 02 required to receive liquefied natural gas from the boundary of the liquefied 03 natural gas plant for marine transportation, including auxiliary vessels used in 04 the operation of the terminal; 05 (B) "Point Thomson unit gas transmission line" means a natural 06 gas transmission line from the outlet flange of the Point Thomson unit 07 production facility to the inlet flange of the gas treatment plant; and 08 (C) "Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line" means a natural 09 gas transmission line from the outlet flange of the Prudhoe Bay unit central gas 10 facility to the inlet flange of the gas treatment plant; 11 (6) "phase one" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a 12 gas pipeline and other related infrastructure required for the transportation of natural 13 gas from the North Slope to the Southcentral region of the state; 14 (7) "phase two" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a 15 gas treatment plant, a marine terminal, a liquefied natural gas plant, and other related 16 infrastructure required for the export of natural gas; 17 (8) "throughput" 18 (A) means 19 (i) the volume of natural gas measured by summing all 20 volumes sold or otherwise delivered at each outlet or offtake point 21 along the gas pipeline; and 22 (ii) natural gas consumed as fuel for the operation of a 23 liquefaction facility; 24 (B) does not include natural gas consumed as fuel for pipeline 25 compression. 26 * Sec. 31. AS 44.33 is amended by adding a new section to read: 27 Article 13A. Natural Gas Project Municipal Impact Grant Fund. 28 Sec. 44.33.850. Natural gas project municipal impact grant fund. (a) The 29 natural gas project municipal impact grant fund is established in the department. The 30 fund consists of money received by the state from a project developer of an Alaska 31 liquefied natural gas project and appropriated to the fund by the legislature. 01 (b) The department shall use the money appropriated to the fund to timely 02 distribute grants to impacted municipalities for activities, services, or facilities that 03 offset verified actual or reasonably expected effects of construction of a gas pipeline. 04 When administering grants under this subsection, the department shall prioritize grant 05 awards based on the needs of the impacted municipality, the severity of the effects 06 caused by construction of the pipeline, and the correlation of the effect to the 07 construction of the pipeline. The department shall adopt regulations governing the 08 distribution of grants under this subsection. 09 (c) In this section, 10 (1) "department" means the Department of Commerce, Community, 11 and Economic Development; 12 (2) "fund" means the natural gas project municipal impact grant fund 13 established in (a) of this section; 14 (3) "gas pipeline" has the meaning given in AS 31.25.390; 15 (4) "impacted municipality" means the North Slope Borough, 16 Fairbanks North Star Borough, Denali Borough, Municipality of Anchorage, 17 Matanuska-Susitna Borough, and Kenai Peninsula Borough; 18 (5) "project developer" means an entity responsible for coordinating 19 the financing and construction of a natural gas project. 20 * Sec. 32. AS 31.25.100 and 31.25.110 are repealed. 21 * Sec. 33. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 22 read: 23 REQUIRED REPORT: PHASE TWO OF THE ALASKA LIQUEFIED NATURAL 24 GAS PROJECT. (a) Before a final investment decision is made on phase two of the Alaska 25 liquefied natural gas project, the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation shall deliver a 26 report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and shall 27 notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must include 28 (1) a discussion and review of the effects and effectiveness of this Act on the 29 Alaska liquefied natural gas project; 30 (2) if applicable, suggestions for additional changes to law related to the 31 Alaska liquefied natural gas project, before implementation of phase two. 01 (b) In this section, 02 (1) "Alaska liquefied natural gas project" has the meaning given in 03 AS 31.25.390; 04 (2) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of a natural 05 gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner to proceed from the 06 planning phase to the implementation and construction phase of phase two of the Alaska 07 liquefied natural gas project; a final investment decision has not been made until the project 08 developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 09 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing required to 10 construct phase two of the project; 11 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and construction 12 agreements for construction of phase two of the project; 13 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 14 construction and operation of phase two of the project; 15 (D) completed a cost estimate for phase two of the project; 16 (E) completed a final resource report of phase two of the project; 17 (3) "phase two" means a phase of the Alaska liquefied natural gas project that 18 includes a gas treatment plant, a marine terminal, a liquefied natural gas plant, as defined in 19 AS 31.25.390, and other related infrastructure required for the export of liquefied natural gas. 20 * Sec. 34. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 21 read: 22 APPLICABILITY: ALASKA GASLINE DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION 23 CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENTS, SUBSIDIARIES, NOTIFICATIONS, LEGAL 24 RELATIONSHIPS. (a) AS 31.25.080(a)(1) and (6), as amended by sec. 9 of this Act, apply to 25 a transfer or disposition occurring on or after the effective date of sec. 9 of this Act. 26 (b) AS 31.25.090(j) and (k), added by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to a confidentiality 27 agreement entered into on or after the effective date of sec. 12 of this Act. 28 (c) AS 31.25.145(a), added by sec. 18 of this Act, applies to revenue generated on and 29 after the effective date of sec. 18 of this Act. 30 (d) AS 31.25.280, added by sec. 21 of this Act, applies to a legal relationship with a 31 foreign entity entered into on or after the effective date of sec. 21 of this Act. In this 01 subsection, "legal relationship" has the meaning given in AS 31.25.280(c), added by sec. 21 02 of this Act. 03 (e) AS 31.25.285, added by sec. 21 of this Act, applies to a legal relationship entered 04 into on or after the effective date of sec. 21 of this Act. In this subsection, "legal relationship" 05 has the meaning given in AS 31.25.285(b), added by sec. 21 of this Act. 06 * Sec. 35. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 APPLICABILITY: OIL AND GAS ENTITY TAX. The tax established under 09 AS 43.20.019, added by sec. 25 of this Act, applies to a qualified entity for a tax year 10 beginning on or after January 1, 2028. In this section, "qualified entity" has the meaning given 11 in AS 43.20.019(g), added by sec. 25 of this Act. 12 * Sec. 36. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 TRANSITION: EXISTING OPTIONS. (a) Within 30 days after the effective date of 15 sec. 15 of this Act, the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation shall notify the president of 16 the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee 17 of each house of the legislature of any existing options to invest in a revenue-generating 18 project, as required under AS 31.25.125, added by sec. 15 of this Act. 19 (b) An option for state participation in a revenue-generating project negotiated by the 20 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation agreed to before the effective date of sec. 15 of this 21 Act must allow the state to exercise the option for at least 180 days after the corporation 22 notifies the legislature under AS 31.25.125, added by sec. 15 of this Act. 23 * Sec. 37. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 24 read: 25 CONDITIONAL EFFECT: BILL; NOTIFICATION TO THE REVISOR OF 26 STATUTES. (a) Sections 1, 2, 4 - 6, and 28 - 30 of this Act take effect only if, before 27 January 1, 2032, the commissioner of revenue determines that 28 (1) the project developer of a natural gas project has paid the state 29 $40,000,000 within 60 days after a final investment decision is made on phase one of the 30 natural gas project and contractually agrees to pay an additional $40,000,000 to the state 31 within 60 days after a final investment decision is made on phase two of the natural gas 01 project; the legislature may appropriate amounts required to be paid under this section to the 02 natural gas project municipal impact grant fund, established in AS 44.33.850, added by sec. 03 31 of this Act; neither the state nor a corporation of the state may be responsible for the 04 payment or a portion of the payment required by this paragraph; 05 (2) the primary owner of property that could be taxable under AS 43.59.020, 06 added by sec. 30 of this Act, has entered into a project labor agreement covering work in the 07 state on all phases of construction of the gas pipeline, camp facilities, Alaska liquefied natural 08 gas import or export facilities, carbon capture facilities, compressor, metering, or heater 09 facilities, gas treatment plants, and infrastructure related to those projects; in this paragraph, 10 "project labor agreement" means a comprehensive collective bargaining agreement between 11 the owner and the appropriate labor organizations to promote economy and efficiency and to 12 ensure expedited construction with labor stability by employing qualified residents of the 13 state; 14 (3) the construction of the gas pipeline, camp facilities, Alaska liquefied 15 natural gas import or export facilities, carbon capture facilities, compressor, metering, or 16 heater facilities, gas treatment plants, and infrastructure related to those projects, including all 17 fabrication in the state, will be performed by employees of contractors or subcontractors who 18 receive the current prevailing rate of wages specified in the latest determination of prevailing 19 rate of wages for public construction projects issued by the Department of Labor and 20 Workforce Development under AS 36.05.010; 21 (4) not less than 15 percent of the total hours worked in the state on the gas 22 pipeline, camp facilities, Alaska liquefied natural gas import or export facilities, carbon 23 capture facilities, compressor, metering, or heater facilities, gas treatment plants, and 24 infrastructure related to those projects will be performed by apprentices from federally 25 registered apprenticeship programs; and 26 (5) the project developer of a natural gas project who would be responsible for 27 constructing a spur line has committed to construct the spur line that serves the City of 28 Fairbanks and the Fairbanks North Star Borough; to meet the requirement of this paragraph, 29 (A) the project developer shall commit to, on or before completion of 30 phase one of the project, timely and in good faith begin all necessary permit 31 applications and take action on any other regulatory requirements necessary for the 01 construction of the spur line, including, if the Regulatory Commission of Alaska has 02 jurisdiction over the tariffs, 03 (i) initiating a tariff proceeding; and 04 (ii) filing with the commission for systemwide tariff treatment 05 for the spur line with an economically viable gas sales contract; 06 (B) the project developer shall commit to begin construction on a spur 07 line within one year after receiving all permits and meeting the necessary regulatory 08 requirements described in (A) of this paragraph; and 09 (C) the spur line must 10 (i) have sufficient capacity to serve reasonably projected 11 residential, commercial, and industrial demand in the Interior area of the state; 12 (ii) be scheduled to begin operations within two years after the 13 commencement of commercial operations of a major component of the natural 14 gas project; 15 (iii) be designed to connect with local distribution 16 infrastructure capable of delivering natural gas to the City of Fairbanks and the 17 surrounding urban area; 18 (iv) be designed and operated to deliver gas at the lowest 19 reasonable cost consistent with safe and reliable service; and 20 (v) allocate costs, including capital, financing, and construction 21 costs, justly, reasonably, and not unduly discriminatorily, across all consumers 22 systemwide, including consumers in the area from the North Slope to the 23 Southcentral regions of the state and, to the extent allowed under federal law, 24 export consumers; costs related to financing or construction of the spur line 25 may not be allocated solely to the Interior area of the state. 26 (b) If the commissioner of revenue determines that the conditions in (a) of this section 27 have been met, the commissioner of revenue shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing 28 within 30 days after making the determination. 29 (c) In this section, 30 (1) "economically viable gas sales contract" means a contract, precedent 31 agreement, memorandum of understanding, tariff-supported sales arrangement, or other 01 commercially reasonable arrangement for the sale, delivery, transportation, or distribution of 02 natural gas to serve current or reasonably projected residential, commercial, institutional, 03 utility, or industrial demand in the City of Fairbanks, the Fairbanks North Star Borough, or 04 the surrounding Interior area of the state, including demand aggregated by a public utility, gas 05 distribution utility, local government, state agency, or other entity serving customers in the 06 Interior area of the state; the gas sales contract need not demonstrate that the spur line alone 07 will recover all capital, financing, construction, operation, or maintenance costs solely from 08 customers in the Interior area of the state; 09 (2) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of a natural 10 gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner to proceed from the 11 planning phase to the implementation and construction phase of the applicable phase of the 12 natural gas project; a final investment decision has not been made until the project developer 13 or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 14 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing required to 15 construct the applicable phase of the project; 16 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and construction 17 agreements for construction of the applicable phase of the project; 18 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 19 construction and operation of the applicable phase of the project; 20 (D) completed a cost estimate for the applicable phase of the project; 21 (E) completed a final resource report of the applicable phase of the 22 project; 23 (3) "gas pipeline" means a gas pipeline, as defined in AS 31.25.390, that is 24 expected to be subject to the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020, added by sec. 30 25 of this Act; 26 (4) "phase one" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a gas 27 pipeline and other related infrastructure required for the transportation of natural gas from the 28 North Slope to the Southcentral region of the state; 29 (5) "phase two" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a gas 30 treatment plant, a marine terminal, a liquefied natural gas plant, and other related 31 infrastructure required for the export of natural gas; 01 (6) "spur line" 02 (A) means 03 (i) a natural gas transmission or lateral line that branches from 04 the main gas pipeline for the primary purpose of delivering natural gas to the 05 City of Fairbanks and the Fairbanks North Star Borough; and 06 (ii) compressing and metering equipment and interconnection 07 facilities related to the transmission or lateral line described in (i) of this 08 subparagraph; 09 (B) does not include infrastructure used for the export of natural gas or 10 lateral lines not necessary for delivering natural gas to a local community or utility 11 distribution system; 12 (7) "systemwide" means the area from the North Slope to the Southcentral 13 regions of the state. 14 * Sec. 38. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 15 read: 16 CONDITIONAL EFFECT: EDUCATION FUNDING. Section 3 of this Act takes 17 effect only if sec. 2 of this Act takes effect. 18 * Sec. 39. If, under sec. 37(a) of this Act, secs. 1, 2, 4 - 6, and 28 - 30 of this Act take effect, 19 they take effect on the day after the date the commissioner of revenue determines that the 20 conditions in sec. 37(a) of this Act have been met. 21 22 * Sec. 40. If, under sec. 38 of this Act, sec. 3 of this Act takes effect, it takes effect five 23 years after a final investment decision is made on phase two of the natural gas project. In this 24 section, 25 (1) "final investment decision" has the meaning given in AS 31.25.270; 26 (2) "phase two" has the meaning given in AS 43.59.100; 27 (3) "natural gas project" has the meaning given in AS 43.59.100. 28 * Sec. 41. Sections 25 - 27 and 35 of this Act take effect January 1, 2028. 29 * Sec. 42. Except as provided in secs. 39 - 41 of this Act, this Act takes effect immediately 30 under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.